pt-PT: Categoria de acidez/pH do limpa-rodas: Ácido; Alcalino; pH neutro; pH equilibrado (quase neutro); Outro
vi: Độ axit/độ pH của dung dịch vệ sinh bánh xe: Có tính axit; Có tính kiềm; Độ pH trung tính; Cân bằng độ pH (gần trung tính); Khác
pl: Kwasowość/kategoria pH środka do felg: Kwasowy; Zasadowy; Neutralne pH; Zrównoważone pH (zbliżone do neutralnego); Inne
hu: Keréktisztító savasság/pH-kategóriája: Savas; Lúgos; pH-semleges; pH-kiegyensúlyozott (közel semleges); Egyéb
ko: 휠 클리너 산도/pH 범주: 산성; 알칼리성; pH 중성; pH 균형(중성에 가까움); 기타
ru: Кислотность/pH категория очистителя дисков: Кислотные; Щелочные; Нейтральный pH; Сбалансированный pH (близкий к нейтральному); Другое
it: Categoria di acidità/pH del detergente per cerchi: Acido; Alcalino; A pH neutro; A pH bilanciato (quasi neutro); Altro
sk-SK: Kategória kyslosti/pH čističa kolies: Kyslé; Zásadité; Neutrálne pH; S neutrálnym pH (takmer neutrálne); Iné
bg-BG: Категория на киселинност / pH на препарат за джанти: Киселинна; Алкална; С неутрално pH; С балансирано pH (близо до неутрално); Друго
nl: Zuurtegraad/pH-categorie van wielreiniger: Zuur; Alkalisch; pH-neutraal; pH-gebalanceerd (bijna neutraal); Overig
sl-SI: Kislost/pH kategorija čistila za platišča (kolesa): Kislo; Alkalno; Nevtralen pH; Uravnotežen pH (skoraj nevtralen); Drugo
ro-RO: Categoria de aciditate/pH a soluției de curățare pentru jante: Acidă; Alcalină; pH neutru; pH echilibrat (aproape neutru); Altele
lt-LT: Ratų valiklio rūgštingumo / pH kategorija: Rūgštinis; Šarminis; Neutralaus pH; Subalansuoto pH (beveik neutralus); Kita
nb: Syre- og pH-kategori for felgrensemidler: Surt; Alkalisk; pH-nøytral; pH-balansert (nær nøytral); Annet
th: ระดับความเป็นกรดหรือค่า pH ของน้ำยาทำความสะอาดล้อ: เป็นกรด; เป็นด่าง; ค่า pH เป็นกลาง; ค่า pH สมดุล (ใกล้เคียงเป็นกลาง); อื่นๆ
en: Wheel cleaner acidity / pH category: Acidic; Alkaline; pH neutral; pH-balanced (near neutral); Other
zh-CN: 轮子清洁剂酸度/pH 值类别: 酸性; 碱性; pH 中性; pH 平衡（接近中性）; 其他
de: Säuregrad-/pH-Kategorie des Felgenreinigers: Sauer; Alkalisch; pH-neutral; pH-ausgewogen (nahezu neutral); Andere
fr: Catégorie d’acidité ou de pH du nettoyant pour jantes: Acide; Alcalin; pH neutre; pH équilibré (presque neutre); Autre
tr: Jant temizleyici asitlik/pH kategorisi: Asidik; Alkali; pH nötr; pH dengeli (nötre yakın); Diğer
da: Surhedsgrad eller pH-kategori for fælgrens: Syreholdig; Alkalisk; pH-neutral; pH-balanceret (næsten neutral); Andet
zh-TW: 輪圈清潔劑酸度 / pH 值類別: 酸性; 鹼性; pH 中性; 酸鹼平衡 (接近中性); 其他
es: Categoría de acidez/pH del limpiador de ruedas: Ácido; Alcalino; pH neutro; pH balanceado (casi neutro); Otro
fi: Vanteenpuhdistusaineen happamuus/pH-luokka: Hapan; Emäksinen; pH-neutraali; pH-tasapainotettu (lähes neutraali); Muu
pt-BR: Limpa-rodas categoria de acidez / pH: Ácido; Alcalino; pH neutro; pH balanceado (quase neutro); Outro
sv: Hjulrengöringsmedel surhetsgrad / pH-kategori: Sur; Alkalisk; pH-neutral; pH-balanserad (nära neutral); Övrigt
el: Κατηγορία οξύτητας / pH καθαριστικού ζαντών: Όξινο; Αλκαλικό; Ουδέτερο pH; Ισορροπημένο pH (σχεδόν ουδέτερο); Άλλο
hr-HR: Kategorija kiselosti/pH sredstva za čišćenje kotača: Kiselo; Alkalno; Neutralan pH; Uravnotežen pH (gotovo neutralno); Ostalo
ja: ホイールクリーナー酸性度／pH分類: 酸性; アルカリ性; 中性 (pH ニュートラル); pH バランス (弱中性); その他
cs: Kategorie kyselosti / pH čističe kol: Kyselé; Zásadité; Neutrální pH; Vyvážené pH (téměř neutrální); Jiné